Illinois, session 104th, SB1215.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Gun 5Crime Charging and Sentencing Accountability and Transparency 6Act. 7    Section 5. Plea agreement; State's Attorney. In a criminal 8case, if a defendant is charged with an offense involving the 9illegal use or possession of a firearm and subsequently enters 10into a plea agreement in which the charge will be reduced to a 11lesser offense or a non-weapons offense in exchange for a plea 12of guilty, at or before the time of sentencing, the State's 13Attorney shall file with the court a written statement of his 14or her reasons in support of the plea agreement, which shall 15specifically state why the offense or offenses of conviction 16resulting from the plea agreement do not include the 17originally charged weapons offense. The written statement 18shall be part of the court record in the case and a copy shall 19be provided to any person upon request.  20    Section 10. Sentencing; judge. In a criminal case in which 21the original charge is or was for an offense involving the 22illegal use or possession of a firearm, if a defendant pleads   SB1215- 2 -LRB104 03934 RLC 13958 b1guilty or is found guilty of the original charge or lesser 2offense or a non-weapons offense, in imposing sentence, the 3judge shall set forth in a written sentencing order his or her 4reasons for imposing the sentence or accepting the plea 5agreement. A copy of the written sentencing order shall be 6provided to any person upon request.